Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 44 DIVISION OF FINANCIAL SERVICES
11-44-110. Power to take possession of association.

If the commissioner, as the result of any examination or from any report made to him, finds that any association doing business in this state is violating the provisions of its articles of incorporation or bylaws or of the laws of this state provided for its government or is conducting its business in an unsafe or unauthorized manner, by an order addressed to such association, he may direct a discontinuance of such violations or unsafe or unauthorized practices and a conformity with all the requirements of law.

If such association refuses or neglects to comply with such order within the time specified therein, or if it appears to the commissioner that any association is in an unsafe condition or is conducting its business in an unsafe manner such as to render its further proceedings hazardous to the public or to any of its members, or if he finds that its assets are impaired to such an extent that it threatens loss to the withdrawable shares, or if any association refuses to submit its books, papers, and accounts to the inspection of the commissioner or any of his examiners, his deputy, or his assistants, or if any officer refuses to be examined upon oath concerning the affairs of such association, then the commissioner may revoke the certificate of authority of such association, which shall act as an injunction against the association issuing any new shares or stock, making any new loans, transferring any shares or stock, or making any change in its managerial or directorial personnel during the time such revocation is in effect.

The commissioner may, with the written approval of the board, take possession of the property, business, and assets of such an association and retain such possession until such association, with the consent of the commissioner, resumes business or until its affairs are liquidated. Such association, with the consent of the commissioner, may resume business upon such conditions as may be prescribed by the commissioner, but such savings and loan association shall pay all the expenses of the commissioner and the commissioner's deputy and employees in so taking possession of its property and assets.

In addition to all other powers to take possession of any association, the commissioner may appoint himself or herself or a third party as conservator of any association and immediately take possession and control of the business and assets of the association if the commissioner determines that:

Such action is necessary to conserve the assets of the association or to protect the interests of its shareholders from acts or omissions of the existing management;

The association, by a resolution of its board of directors, consents to such action;

There is a willful violation of a cease-and-desist order that results in the association being operated in an unsafe or unsound manner; or

The association is significantly undercapitalized and has no reasonable prospect of becoming adequately capitalized.

The commissioner may appoint a conservator and take immediate possession of the association without prior notice or a hearing; except that, within ten days after the conservator is appointed, the association may file an appeal with the board requesting the board to rescind the commissioner's appointment of a conservator. Upon receipt of a timely appeal, the board shall set a date for hearing and determine whether the commissioner's appointment should be rescinded; except that such appeal shall not act as a stay of the commissioner's action. If the board finds the commissioner's action was unauthorized, the board shall restore control of the association to its board of directors. If no appeal is filed within ten days after the commissioner's appointment of a conservator, all action taken by the commissioner shall be final.

In extraordinary circumstances, upon order of the board, any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the board be conducted publicly. Such extraordinary circumstances occur only when specific concern arises about prompt withdrawal of moneys from the association.

The conservator shall have all the powers of the shareholders, directors, and officers of the association and shall be authorized to operate the association in its own name or to conserve its assets as directed by the commissioner. The conservator shall conduct the business of the association and make regular reports to the commissioner until such time as the commissioner has determined that the purposes of conservatorship have been accomplished and the association should be returned to the control of its board of directors. All costs incident to the conservatorship shall be paid out of the assets of the association. If the commissioner determines that the purposes of the conservatorship will not be accomplished, the commissioner may proceed with the involuntary liquidation of the association in the manner described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

If a conservator is appointed, and is other than the federal deposit insurance corporation, the office of thrift supervision or its successors, or an employee of the division of financial services, the conservator and any assistants shall provide a bond, payable to the association and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, which meets with the approval of the financial services board, for the faithful discharge of their duties in connection with such conservatorship and the accounting for all moneys coming into their hands. The cost of such bond shall be paid from the assets of the association. Suit may be maintained on such bond by any person injured by a breach of the conditions thereof. This requirement may be deemed met if the financial services board determines that the association's fidelity bond covers the conservator and any assistants.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 340, § 9.

CSA:

C. 25, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-10.

L. 99:

(3) amended and (4) added, p. 1012, § 7, effective August 4.

11-44-110.5. Supervisory mergers.

As a condition to allowing an association to resume business, the commissioner may require the association to merge with a domestic, foreign, or federal savings and loan association. In the case of such a supervisory merger initiated by the commissioner or the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, the provisions of section 11-43-101 shall not apply.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 246, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 152, § 61, effective July 1.

11-44-111. Appeal from commissioner's action.

When any association, of whose property, business, and assets the commissioner has taken possession, deems itself aggrieved thereby, it may appeal to the financial services board pursuant to section 11-44-101.8 and receive expedited consideration as soon as practicable, and if it has, within ten days after the commissioner took possession, served written notice on the commissioner of its intention to seek to enjoin in court the commissioner's further proceedings, it may apply at any time within thirty days after such taking possession to the district court of the county in which the principal office of the association is located to enjoin further proceedings. After citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and hearing the evidence of the parties and determining the facts, the court may, upon the merits, dismiss such application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and direct the commissioner to surrender such business, property, and assets to such association. An appeal from such judgment shall operate as a stay from the commissioner's taking possession, and no bond need be given if such appeal is taken by the commissioner; but, if such appeal is taken by such association, a bond shall be given as required by the court.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 341, § 10.

CSA:

C. 25, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-11.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1452, § 11, effective June 6.

11-44-112. Appointment of commissioner as receiver - assignment for benefit of creditors prohibited.

Upon application to the district court, the commissioner may be appointed the receiver to operate a savings and loan association when such appointment is necessary to avoid the association's assets becoming impaired or when the association is operating in an unsafe manner. In lieu of the commissioner being appointed a receiver or liquidator, the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, or an insurer authorized to insure obligations or accounts pursuant to articles 40 to 47.5 of this title, may be tendered an appointment as receiver or liquidator. For the purposes of rule 98 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, venue of the commissioner is in the city and county of Denver. No savings and loan association shall make an assignment for the benefit of creditors.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 342, § 11.

CSA:

C. 25, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-12.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 246, § 2, effective March 25.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 382, § 12, effective May 11.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 152, § 62, effective July 1.

11-44-113. Procedure under court order.

The commissioner may retain possession of any savings and loan association for the purpose of liquidating its affairs, but before doing so he shall furnish a bond, executed by some surety company authorized to do business in this state and running to the people of the state of Colorado, in a penal sum equal to the value of the negotiable assets of the association, as nearly as may be determined, for the faithful discharge of his duties in connection with liquidating the affairs of the association and accounting for all moneys coming into his hands. Such bond shall be approved by the governor and be filed in the office of the secretary of state. The cost of such bond shall be paid from the assets of the association. Suits may be maintained on such bond by any person injured by a breach of the conditions thereof.

Upon taking such possession, the commissioner shall have authority to collect all moneys due to such association, and to give full receipt therefor, and to do such other acts as are necessary or expedient to collect, conserve, or protect its business, property, and assets.

If the commissioner is in possession of the business, property, and assets of any association, regardless of whether or not he is liquidating the affairs of such association, the commissioner, in his discretion, may apply to the district court of the county in which the principal office in this state of such association is located for an order confirming any action taken by the commissioner or authorizing the commissioner to do any act or to execute any instrument not expressly authorized by articles 40 to 46 of this title, which order shall be made after a hearing, on such notice as the court shall prescribe. He may pay and discharge any secured claims against such association, and, within six months after taking such possession, he may disaffirm any executory contracts, including leases, to which such association is a party and disaffirm any partially executed contracts, including leases, to the extent that they remain executory.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 342, § 12.

CSA:

C. 25, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-13.

11-44-114. Noncompliance with orders - penalty.

If the commissioner demands possession of the property, business, and assets of any association, pursuant to section 11-44-110, the refusal of any officer, agent, employee, or director of such association to comply with such demand constitutes a class 2 misdemeanor; and, if such demand is not complied with within twenty-four hours after service, the commissioner may call to the commissioner's assistance the sheriff of the county in which the principal place of business of such association is located, by written demand under the commissioner's hand and official seal; whereupon it shall become the duty of such official to enforce the demands of the commissioner.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 343, § 13.

CSA:

C. 25, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-14.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3152, § 128, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor, see § 18-1.3-501.

11-44-115. Officers to furnish schedule of property.

Upon taking possession of the property, business, and assets of any association, the commissioner shall require the president and secretary of such association to make a schedule of all its property and assets and of all collateral held by it as security for loans, and to make oath that such schedule sets forth all such property, assets, and collateral which such association owns or to which it is entitled, and to deliver such schedule and the possession of all such property and collateral as may not have been so previously delivered to the commissioner, who may examine under oath such president and secretary, the other officers of such association, or the directors, agents, or employees thereof at any time to determine whether or not all the property, assets, and collateral which such association owns or to which it is entitled have been transferred and delivered into his possession.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 344, § 14.

CSA:

C. 25, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-15.

11-44-116. Liquidation powers of commissioner.

In liquidating the affairs of an association, the commissioner has the power to collect all moneys due to and all claims of such association and give full receipt therefor; to release or reconvey all real or personal property pledged, hypothecated, or transferred in trust as security for loans; to approve and pay all just and equitable claims; to commence and prosecute all actions and proceedings necessary to enforce liquidations; to compound bad or doubtful debts and to compound and settle with any debtor or creditor of such association or with the persons having possession of its property or being in any way responsible at law or in equity to such association, upon such terms and conditions and in such manner as he deems just and beneficial to such association; in case of mutual dealings between the association and any person, to allow just setoffs in favor of such persons in all cases in which the same ought to be allowed according to law and equity; in case of borrowers holding shares of the association pledged to the association as security for said loan, to allow the amount paid in on said shares, together with all dividends legally declared thereon, to be set off against the amount due on said loan; and to sell, convey, and transfer real and personal property.

If a purchaser for any bad or doubtful debts cannot be obtained and it appears improbable that recovery thereon can be had and that the costs of actions to enforce collections of the same would probably be lost, the court may direct that suits thereon need not be brought.

For the purpose of executing and performing any of the powers and duties conferred upon him, the commissioner, in the name of such association or in his own name, may prosecute and defend any and all suits and other legal proceedings and, in the name of such association or in his own name, as commissioner, may execute, acknowledge, and deliver any deeds, assignments, releases, and other instruments necessary and proper to effectuate any sale of real or personal property or other transaction in connection with the liquidation of such association. Any deed, assignment, release, or other instrument executed pursuant to the authority given shall be valid and effectual for all purposes as though the same had been executed by the officers of such association by authority of its board of directors.

In case any of the real property so sold is located in a county other than the county in which the application to the court for leave to sell the same is made, the commissioner shall cause a certified copy of the order authorizing or ratifying such sale to be filed in the office of the recorder of the county in which such real property is located.

Upon determining to liquidate an association, the commissioner shall cause an inventory of all the assets of such association to be made in duplicate, the original to be filed with the court and the duplicate in the office of the commissioner. He shall cause due notice to be given, by publication once a week for four successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published at or near the principal place of business of such association in this state, to all persons having claims against it as creditors, or investors, or otherwise, to present and file same and make legal proof thereof at a place and within a time to be designated in such publication, which time shall be not less than two months after such first publication. Within ten days after such first publication, he shall cause a copy of such notice to be mailed to all persons whose names appear of record upon its books as creditors or investors, and, upon the expiration of the time fixed for the presentation of claims, the commissioner shall prepare or cause to be prepared in duplicate a full and complete schedule of all claims presented, specifying by classes those that have been approved and those that have been disapproved, and shall file the original with the court and the duplicate in the office of the commissioner. Not later than five days after the time of filing such schedule with the court, written notice shall be mailed to all claimants whose claims have been rejected.

Action to enforce the payment of any rejected claim must be brought and service had within four months after the date of filing of the schedule of claims with the proper court; otherwise all such actions shall be forever barred. All claims of creditors, investors, or other persons against the association or against any property owned or held by it must be presented to the commissioner in writing, verified by the claimant or someone in his behalf, within the period limited in the notice mentioned in subsection (5) of this section for the presentation of claims; and any claims not so presented shall be forever barred; but the claim of any investor, appearing upon the books of the association as a valid claim, presented after the expiration of the time fixed in said notice shall be entitled to share in any dividends declared subsequent to the presentation of such claim.

The commissioner under his hand and official seal may appoint one or more special deputies to assist in the duties of liquidation and distribution under his direction and may also employ such special legal counsel, accountants, and assistants as may be needful and requisite and fix the salaries and compensation to be allowed and paid to each, all to be in a reasonable and commensurate sum. All such salaries and compensation and such other reasonable and necessary expenses as may be incurred in the liquidation shall be paid by the commissioner from the funds of such association in his hands.

From the net realization of such assets in excess of such salaries, compensation, and expenses, the commissioner shall first pay all approved claims other than to investors, and thereafter he shall distribute and pay dividends in liquidation to the shareholders and investors in the association, other than holders of permanent stock, until their claims are fully paid or such assets or funds are exhausted. Such distributions shall be made as funds are available therefor, to the extent of ten percent or more of the approved claims of the class of claimants then entitled to distribution, and shall continue until all the assets have been realized upon and a final dividend in liquidation is declared and paid.

Upon the payment of a final dividend in liquidation, the commissioner shall prepare and file with the court a full and final statement of the liquidation, including a summary of the receipts and disbursements, and a duplicate thereof shall be filed in the office of the commissioner, and, after due hearing and approval by the court, the liquidation shall be deemed to be closed.

The determination by the commissioner to liquidate any association, evidenced by filing written notice of such determination with the court, shall operate to stay or dissolve any actions or attachments instituted or levied within thirty days next preceding the taking of possession of such association by the commissioner, and, pending the process of liquidation, no attachment or execution shall be levied nor lien created upon any of the property of such association.

Whenever, in case of any association which has issued permanent stock, the commissioner has fully liquidated all claims other than claims of such stockholders, and has made due provision for any and all known or unclaimed liabilities, excepting claims of permanent stockholders, and has paid all expenses of liquidation, he shall call a meeting of the stockholders of said savings and loan association by giving notice thereof for thirty days in one or more newspapers published in the county in which the principal office of the association is located. At such meeting the commissioner shall deliver to such stockholders all the property and effects of said association remaining in his possession, except its records, which shall be retained by him as part of the records of his office, and, upon such transfer and delivery, he shall be discharged from any and all further liability to said association or its creditors, and thereupon the association shall be in the same position as though it had never been authorized to transact a savings and loan business.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 344, § 15.

CSA:

C. 25, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-16.

11-44-117. Setoffs.

Credits on loan shares of all persons indebted to any savings and loan association in the possession of the commissioner, whether such indebtedness is due or to become due, shall be applied by him on account of such indebtedness.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 349, § 16.

CSA:

C. 25, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-17.

11-44-118. Commissioner and deputy not to accept gifts.

Neither the commissioner nor his deputy shall receive or accept any bribe, gratuity, or reward from any person or association for any purpose whatever or knowingly and willfully make any false or fraudulent report of the condition of any association for any purpose whatsoever. One or more of the directors of any association may be present at any examination of the affairs thereof, but the absence of any or all of the officers or directors shall not operate to prevent the commissioner or his deputy from proceeding with such examination.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 349, § 17.

CSA:

C. 25, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-18.

11-44-119. Association's right to resort to court.

Nothing in articles 40 to 46 of this title shall be construed to prevent an association or person affected by any order, ruling, proceeding, act, or action of the commissioner or the financial services board or any person acting on behalf and at the instance of the commissioner or the financial services board, or both, from testing the validity of the same in any court of competent jurisdiction, through injunction, appeal, or other proper process or proceeding, mandatory or otherwise.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 350, § 18.

CSA:

C. 25, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-19.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1453, § 12, effective June 6.

11-44-120. Records of commissioner.

The commissioner shall maintain annually revised summaries disclosing the names of the officers and directors of all savings and loan associations doing business in the state of Colorado during the preceding year, the financial condition of such savings and loan associations, together with a statement of the assets, liabilities, and reserves of the associations, and such other information concerning the same as he may see fit.

These data and any other material circulated in quantity outside the executive branch shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 350, § 19.

CSA:

C. 25, § 65.

L. 39:

p. 251, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-20.

L. 64:

p. 169, § 133.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-20.

L. 83:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 827, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) repealed, p. 1231, § 55, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

11-44-121. Commissioner may destroy records. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 764, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-21.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 140, § 25, effective July 1.

11-44-122. Waiver of membership or stockholder voting.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, whenever the commissioner finds that it is necessary to effect a merger, consolidation, purchase and assumption agreement, conversion to stock association, conversion to mutual association, conversion to federal association, or conversion to state association or other action, as a result of the assets of any association being impaired to the extent that it threatens loss to the withdrawable shares or the association being in an unsafe condition and the time required to give proper notice and hold a meeting to vote on the action is deemed by the commissioner to increase the threat of loss to the withdrawable shares, the commissioner may waive the requirement of a membership or stockholder vote on the action. There shall be no requirement of prior written notice to the affected parties of said waiver.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 247, § 3, effective March 25.

11-44-123. Assessment of civil money penalties.

After notice and a hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and after making a determination that no other appropriate governmental agency has taken similar action against such person for the same act or practice, the commissioner may assess and collect a civil money penalty from any person who has violated any final order issued by the commissioner pursuant to section 11-44-110 (1) or any suspension or removal order issued pursuant to section 11-44-106.5, or who has violated section 11-41-133.

For the purposes of this section, a violation includes, but is not limited to, any action, by any person alone or with another person, which causes, brings about, or results in the participation in, counseling of, or aiding or abetting of a violation.

In extraordinary circumstances, upon order of the commissioner, any hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the commissioner be conducted publicly. Such extraordinary circumstances occur when specific concern arises about prompt withdrawal of moneys from the institution.

Civil money penalties shall be assessed by written notice of assessment of a civil money penalty served upon the person to be assessed. The notice of assessment of a civil money penalty shall state the amount of the penalty, the period for payment, the legal authority for the assessment, and the matters of fact or law constituting the grounds for assessment. The notice of assessment of a civil money penalty may be appealed to the financial services board pursuant to section 11-44-101.8. On appeal, the board may consider, among other matters, whether the civil money penalty assessed by the commissioner is appropriate considering the financial resources of the person assessed.

In determining the amount of the civil money penalty to be assessed, the commissioner shall consider the good faith of the person assessed, the gravity of the violation, any previous violations by the person assessed, and such other matters as the commissioner may deem appropriate; except that the civil money penalty shall be not more than one thousand dollars per day for each day the person assessed is determined by the commissioner to be in violation of a cease-and-desist order or an order of suspension or removal. Alternatively, the commissioner may assess a civil money penalty for such violation in a lump-sum amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars.

Civil money penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be due and payable and collected within thirty days after the notice of assessment of a civil money penalty is issued by the commissioner; except that the commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, may compromise, modify, or set aside any civil money penalty. If any person fails to pay an assessment after it has become due and payable, the commissioner may refer the matter to the attorney general, who shall recover the amount assessed by action in the district court for the city and county of Denver. Any civil money penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the general fund.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 612, § 8, effective April 19.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1453, § 13, effective June 6.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 1014, § 8, effective August 4.